pl: Strona paska: Lewy; Para; Prawy; Inny
el: Πλευρά τοποθέτησης ιμάντα: Αριστερά; Ζεύγος; Δεξιά; Άλλο
ja: ストラップ側: 左; ペア; 右; その他
nb: Stroppeside: Venstre; Par; Høyre; Annet
it: Lato del cinturino: Sinistra; Paio; Destra; Altro
tr: Kayış tarafı: Sol; Çift; Sağ; Diğer
pt-BR: Tira lado: Esquerda; Par; Direita; Outro
zh-TW: 綁帶側邊: 左; 一對; 右; 其他
hr-HR: Strana remena: Lijevo; Par; Desno; Ostalo
th: ด้านสายรัด: ซ้าย; คู่; ขวา; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Stran traku: Levo; Par; Desno; Drugo
vi: Mặt dây đeo: Trái; Cặp; Phải; Khác
bg-BG: Страна на каишката: Ляво; Двойка; Дясно; Друго
fr: Côté de la sangle: Gauche; Paire; Droite; Autre
pt-PT: Lado da correia: Esquerda; Par; Direita; Outro
de: Gurtseite: Links; Paar; Rechts; Andere
sv: Remsida: Vänster; Par; Höger; Övrigt
da: Remplacering: Venstre; Par; Højre; Andet
nl: Band zijde: Links; Paar; Rechts; Overig
ko: 스트랩 쪽: 왼쪽; 쌍; 오른쪽; 기타
es: Lado de la correa: Izquierda; Par; Derecha; Otro
en: Strap side: Left; Pair; Right; Other
ro-RO: Partea curelei: Stânga; Pereche; Dreapta; Altele
cs: Strana popruhu: Levá; Pár; Pravá; Jiné
lt-LT: Diržo pusė: Kairė; Pora; Dešinė; Kita
ru: Сторона ремня: Левая; Пара; Правая; Другое
sk-SK: Strana popruhu: Ľavý; Pár; Pravý; Iné
zh-CN: 绑带方向: 左侧; 一对; 右侧; 其他
hu: Pánt oldala: Bal; Pár; Jobb; Egyéb
fi: Hihnan kätisyys: Vasen; Pari; Oikea; Muu